Vermont, session 2025-2026, H731.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 1A is redesignated to read:
Subchapter 1A 1B. Notification of Sewage and Wastewater Discharges
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 1A is added to read:
Subchapter 1A. Antidegradation Policy and Implementation
§ 1286. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 2 of 33
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Natural Resources.
(2) “Application” means any request for a permit required by State or
federal law when filed with, and deemed complete by, the reviewing authority.
(3) “Assimilative capacity” means a measure of the capacity of the
receiving waters to assimilate wastes without lowering their quality below the
applicable water quality criteria.
(4) “Cumulative impact” means the collective impact of all past and
present legal discharges within the watershed, upstream of the proposed point
of discharge and evaluated on an individual parameter basis.
(5) “Designated use” means any value or use, whether presently
occurring or not, that is specified in the management objectives for each class
of water as set forth in the Vermont Water Quality Standards or for each lake
class set forth under a lake classification under chapter 49, subchapter 2 of this
title.
(6) “Equilibrium conditions” means a balance between the water flow,
sediment and woody debris supplied to the stream system, and the stream
capacity to transport the sediment and debris loads. Equilibrium exists when
the stream maintains its dimension, pattern, and profile without unnaturally
aggrading or degrading at the river reach or valley segment scales.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 3 of 33
(7) “Existing discharge” means any discharge to the extent authorized
by a valid permit issued under section 1263 or 1265 of this title before January
7, 1985.
(8) “Existing use” means a use that has actually occurred on or after
November 28, 1975, in or on waters, whether or not the use is included in the
standard for classification of the waters, and whether or not the use is presently
occurring.
(9) “High quality waters” means those waters the existing quality of
which exceeds any applicable water quality criteria and that provide important
environmental, economic, social, and other benefits to the persons of the State.
(10) “New discharge” means any discharge not authorized under section
1263 of this title as of January 7, 1985, or any increased pollutant loading or
demand on the assimilative capacity of the receiving waters from an existing
discharge that requires the issuance of a new or amended permit.
(11) “NPDES” means the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination
System Program established by the federal Clean Water Act to permit certain
discharges of pollutants to waters.
(12) “Outstanding resource waters” means those waters designated
under section 1424a of this title.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 4 of 33
(13) “Parameter” means a chemical, physical, or biological
characteristic that is used to assess conditions and that is contained as narrative
or numeric criteria in Vermont’s Water Quality Standards.
(14) “Permit” means a certification, order, or other authorization in
which, during the application review process, compliance with the Vermont
Water Quality Standards is evaluated pursuant to applicable State or federal
law.
(15) “Policy” means Vermont’s antidegradation policy set forth in this
subchapter.
(16) “Practicable” means an alternative is available and capable of being
completed after taking into consideration cost, existing technology, and
logistics in light of the overall purposes of the proposed activity.
(17) “Run-of-river” means flow downstream from a project or activity
that is equal to inflow on an instantaneous basis. A run-of-river project or
activity does not operate out of storage and, therefore, does not artificially
regulate flows downstream.
(18) “Standards” means the Vermont Water Quality Standards required
under this chapter and adopted by the Secretary by rule.
§ 1287. ANTIDEGRADATION POLICY; PURPOSE
(a) Purpose.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 5 of 33
(1) Pursuant to the federal regulations for the Clean Water Act under
40 C.F.R. § 131.12, Vermont is required to adopt and implement a statewide
antidegradation policy to protect and maintain water quality and existing and
designated uses of the State’s waters.
(2) Because the Agency of Natural Resources repeatedly has failed to
comply with legislative directives to adopt a rule to implement the State’s
antidegradation policy, this subchapter declares the State’s antidegradation
policy and the requirements for implementation of the antidegradation policy
in order to protect water quality in outstanding resource waters, protect and
maintain water quality in high quality waters, and identify and protect the
existing uses of all waters of the State.
(b) Antidegradation policy.
(1) General policy. All waters of the State shall be managed in
accordance with the requirements of this subchapter and the Standards to
protect, maintain, and improve water quality.
(2) Protection and determination of existing uses. Existing uses of State
waters and the level of water quality necessary to protect the existing uses of
each water shall be maintained and protected regardless of the water’s
classification.
(A) A determination of what constitutes the existing uses of a
particular water shall be made during the basin planning process; during lake
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 6 of 33
classification under chapter 49, subchapter 2 of this title; or on a case-by-case
basis during consideration of a petition for a classification or reclassification.
The use of waters to receive or transport discharges of waste shall not
constitute an existing use for purposes of the State antidegradation policy or
implementation of this subchapter.
(B) In determining the existing uses to be protected and maintained
under this subchapter and under the Standards, the Secretary shall consider the
designated uses, and at least the following factors:
(i) aquatic biota and wildlife that utilize or are present in waters;
(ii) habitat that supports or is capable of supporting aquatic biota,
wildlife, or plant life;
(iii) the use of the waters for recreation or fishing;
(iv) the use of the water for a public water source or commercial
activity that depends directly on the preservation of an existing high level of
water quality; and
(v) evidence of the use’s ecological significance in the functioning
of the ecosystem or evidence of the use’s rarity.
(C) Waters the existing quality of which exceed any applicable water
quality criteria provide important environmental, economic, social, and other
benefits to the persons of the State. Except as provided in subdivision (D) of
this subdivision (2), waters shall be managed to maintain and protect the higher
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 7 of 33
water quality and minimize risk to existing and designated uses. In all cases,
the level of water quality necessary to maintain and protect all existing uses as
well as applicable water quality criteria shall be maintained.
(D) A limited reduction in the existing higher quality of waters that
exceed existing applicable water quality criteria may be allowed only when it
is shown that:
(i) through the applicable permitting or approval process, the
Secretary has provided public notice of the draft decision and an opportunity
for public comment on the decision;
(ii) after an analysis of alternatives, allowing lower water quality
is necessary to prevent substantial adverse economic or social impacts on the
persons of the State; and
(iii) there shall be achieved the highest statutory and regulatory
requirements for all new or existing point sources, and all cost-effective and
reasonable best management practices for nonpoint source control, consistent
with State law.
(E)(i) The analysis of alternatives required under subdivision (D)(ii)
of this subdivision (b)(2) shall evaluate a range of alternatives that would
prevent or lessen the degradation associated with the proposed activity. When
the analysis identifies one or more practicable alternatives, the Secretary shall
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 8 of 33
only find that a lowering is necessary if one practicable alternative is selected
for implementation.
(ii) To the extent any reduction in the quality of high quality
waters is allowed, the reduction shall be limited to that which complies with
subdivision (D) of this subdivision (b)(2).
(3) Protection of outstanding resource waters and natural condition
lakes. The Secretary may under section 1424a of this title designate certain
waters as outstanding resource waters or under chapter 49, subchapter 2 of this
title designate natural condition lakes. Where the Secretary designates waters
for specific exceptional natural, recreational, cultural, or scenic values, their
existing quality, associated with the values for which they have been
designated, shall, at a minimum, be protected and maintained.
(4) Protection of wetlands. Wetlands and their functions and values
shall be protected as described by the Vermont Wetland Rules.
§ 1288. REQUIRED IMPLEMENTATION OF ANTIDEGRADATION
POLICY; APPLICABILITY
(a) Applicability. The Secretary shall apply the Antidegradation Policy set
forth in section 1287 of this title during the review of any application for any
permit for a new discharge for which compliance with the Standards is
evaluated. Discharges that do not require a permit are not subject to the
Antidegradation Policy.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 9 of 33
(b) Activities subject to review. Activities authorized by the following
permits are subject to review under the antidegradation policy:
(1) NPDES direct discharge permits issued pursuant to section 1263 of
this title and the rules adopted under this chapter;
(2) NPDES direct discharge permits for thermal discharges issued
pursuant to section 1263 of this title;
(3) Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation (CAFO) permits issued
under federal rules or under chapter 47, subchapter 3A of this title;
(4) stormwater permits issued under section 1264 of this title, including
NPDES discharge permits;
(5) wetland permits issued pursuant to chapter 37 of this title;
(6) water quality certifications issued pursuant to section 401 of the
federal Clean Water Act for a federal license or permit, including shoreland
activities, lake encroachments, and stream alterations;
(7) dam orders issued pursuant to section 1082 of this title;
(8) indirect discharge permits issued pursuant to sections 1251, 1259,
and 1263 of this title;
(9) groundwater withdrawal permits issued pursuant to section 1418 of
this title; and
(10) any other NPDES permit issued by the Agency.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 10 of 33
(c) Exemptions. The following permits are exempt from review under the
antidegradation policy:
(1) permits for response actions taken pursuant to section 1283, 1941,
6615, or 6615b of this title or chapter 159, subchapter 3 of this title in response
to a release of hazardous materials that may be hazardous to human health or
that caused an existing water quality impairment;
(2) orders issued pursuant to section 1272 of this title;
(3) permits for discharges from wastewater treatment facilities that are
designed to eliminate unpermitted discharges that pose a threat to public
health, or which caused an existing water quality impairment;
(4) permits for stormwater remediation projects installed to mitigate the
impact of existing stormwater discharges to receiving waters; and
(5) dam orders issued pursuant to section 1095 of this title that authorize
actions necessary to abate a threat to human life or property.
(d) Application to general permits. If a general permit issued by the
Secretary of Natural Resources is reviewed under the antidegradation policy,
an authorization issued under the general permit is exempt from subsequent
review under the antidegradation policy unless the Secretary determines, based
on credible and relevant information and best professional judgment, that the
proposed activity, due to its potential impact, requires a site-specific Tier 2
analysis through the use of an individual permit.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 11 of 33
§ 1289. INFORMATION REQUIRED FROM APPLICANT
(a)(1) The Secretary shall require an applicant for a permit or authorization
subject to the antidegradation policy as set forth in section 1287 of this title to
provide the necessary information to make a determination under the
antidegradation policy.
(2) When the Secretary determines there is insufficient information to
make a determination under the antidegradation policy and the applicant fails
to provide the required information, the Secretary shall deny the application for
the relevant permit or authorization.
(3) All technical, scientific, social, and economic data and analyses
provided to the Secretary shall be developed by qualified professionals.
(b) The Secretary may require an applicant for a permit or authorization
subject to the antidegradation policy to provide the following information, as
the Secretary deems appropriate:
(1) an analysis of alternatives to the proposed discharge;
(2) a description of the proposed activity, discharge, and facility
operations, and their locations;
(3) physical, chemical, and biological data for the receiving waters and
the characteristics of any proposed discharge;
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 12 of 33
(4) water quality modeling analyses;
(5) the presence of existing uses;
(6) the level of treatment and control necessary to maintain and protect
existing and designated uses in a receiving water;
(7) the magnitude, duration, and extent of any lowering of water quality
due to the proposed discharge or activity by itself and in combination with
other presently occurring legal discharges;
(8) the potential impacts, including cumulative impacts, on designated
and existing uses and on high quality waters due to the proposed discharge;
and
(9) social and economic data and analyses, including:
(A) median household income of affected community;
(B) comparison of existing and expected economic conditions and
social services when the proposed activity is fully implemented;
(C) economic gains or losses attributable to the proposed activity;
(D) contribution to social services;
(E) prevention or remediation of environmental or public health
threats;
(F) value of the water resources;
(G) effect on environmental justice focus populations as defined in 3
V.S.A. § 6002; and
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 13 of 33
(H) other relevant environmental, social, and economic impacts of
the proposed activity.
(c)(1) In reviewing an application for a new discharge, the Secretary shall
utilize all credible and relevant information and the best professional judgment
of Agency staff.
(2) Upon completion of review of an application for a new discharge,
the Secretary shall post a draft decision for public review and comment for at
least 30 days.
§ 1290. PUBLIC PARTICIPATION REQUIREMENTS
(a) The Secretary shall provide an opportunity for meaningful participation
for all individuals in accordance with the applicable permit or rulemaking
notice requirements and civil rights requirements.
(b) Public notice for the permit or rule, and the fact sheet, if applicable,
shall include a statement that the permit or rule is consistent with the
antidegradation policy and shall describe how the public can obtain materials
used in the determination.
(c) The Secretary shall provide for intergovernmental coordination,
including contacting local municipal governments, federal entities, or
downstream states or tribes that may be impacted by a change in water quality.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 14 of 33
§ 1291. ANTIDEGRADATION ANALYSIS; TIER 3 PROTECTION OF
OUTSTANDING RESOURCE WATERS
(a) For outstanding resource waters or natural condition lakes designated
for their specific exceptional natural, recreational, cultural, or scenic values,
their existing water quality associated with the values for which they have been
designated shall be maintained and protected.
(b) The impact of the proposed discharge to the existing water quality of an
outstanding resource water or natural condition lake shall be evaluated on a
parameter-by-parameter basis necessary to protect the values for which the
outstanding resource water or natural condition lake was designated.
(c) The Secretary shall evaluate applications for proposed discharges. Only
proposed discharges that meet one or both of the following criteria shall be
eligible for permitting:
(1) The proposed discharge will improve water quality or is necessary
for the maintenance of current environmental conditions.
(2) The proposed discharge is temporary, and it is expected that water
quality in the receiving water will be equal to or better than that which existed
prior to commencement of the discharge. In order to be considered temporary,
the duration of the discharge shall typically occur over a period of days or
months, not years.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 15 of 33
(d) A discharge that results in no measurable reduction in the physical,
chemical, or biological quality of the outstanding resource water shall not be
subject to review under Tier 3.
§ 1292. ANTIDEGRADATION ANALYSIS; TIER 2 PROTECTION OF
HIGH QUALITY WATERS
(a) Applicability. This section applies to high quality waters the existing
quality of which exceeds any applicable water quality criteria and that provide
important environmental, economic, social, and other benefits to the persons of
the State.
(b) Limited reduction in quality. A limited reduction in the existing quality
of high quality waters may be allowed only when it is shown that:
(1) through the applicable permitting or approval process, the Secretary
has provided public notice of the draft permit decision and an opportunity for
public comment on the draft permit decision;
(2) after an analysis of alternatives, allowing lower water quality is
necessary to prevent substantial adverse economic or social impacts on the
persons of the State; and
(3) there shall be achieved the highest statutory and regulatory
requirements for all new or existing point sources, and all cost-effective and
reasonable best management practices for nonpoint source control, consistent
with State law.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 16 of 33
(c) Alternatives. The Secretary shall evaluate alternatives to the proposed
activity, including the location and method of discharge, that would have the
least adverse impact on waters and wetlands of the State, and provided that any
proposed alternative shall not have other significant adverse human health,
safety, or environmental consequences.
(d) Areas not subject to Tier 2 analyses. In evaluating the impact of a
proposed discharge, and considering the nature, persistence, and potential
effects of pollutants contained within the discharge, the Secretary may
determine that the following are not subject to Tier 2 analysis:
(1) a discharge that would result in no measurable reduction in the
physical, chemical, or biological quality of a water;
(2) the portion of a discharge that consists of a specific pollutant when
the pollutant would not be capable of being detected in the applicable receiving
water;
(3) flow modifying activities that would meet one or more of the
following criteria:
(A) no impoundment of water or no impoundment that would alter
the riverine characteristics of the aquatic habitat;
(B) bypass flows that meet or exceed U.S. Fish and Wildlife seasonal
conservation flows (0.5/1.0/4.0);
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 17 of 33
(C) instantaneous run-of-river mode of operation;
(D) surface water withdrawals that qualify as de minimis under the
Agency of Natural Resources’ Procedure for Determining Acceptable
Minimum Streamflows; or
(E) snowmaking water withdrawals that meet the general or de
minimis standards in the Agency of Natural Resources’ Rules for Water
Withdrawals for Snowmaking;
(4) stream alteration activities that would result in channel geometry and
fluvial processes where bed and bank erosion are neither increased nor
transferred to other stream locations, and where floodplain function is
maintained or restored over time; or
(5) activities in waters of the United States, including navigable waters,
within the boundaries of the State subject to the general permits of the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(e) Determination of receiving water quality.
(1) Waters whose existing ambient water quality exceeds the applicable
minimum water quality criteria and indices for the class to which the
waterbody is assigned shall be considered high quality water.
(2) A waterbody will be assessed as high quality on a parameter-by-
parameter basis.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 18 of 33
(3) The Secretary will presume that all waters are high quality for at
least one criterion or index for some portion of the year. This presumption
may be rebutted by credible and relevant information obtained by or provided
to the Secretary.
(4) Any determination of receiving water quality shall include a
consideration of cumulative impacts.
(5) Depending on the nature of the proposed discharge, factors that may
be considered in the evaluation of receiving water quality and assessment of
cumulative impacts include:
(A) existing physical, chemical, and biological data for the receiving
water;
(B) nature of resource impacted, such as stream, lake, river, wetland,
or watershed;
(C) class of the water;
(D) presence of rare, threatened, or endangered species;
(E) presence of salmonid spawning areas;
(F) current legally authorized activities and discharges in the affected
receiving water or watershed;
(G) effect of the proposed activity or discharge;
(H) percent of impervious cover in the associated watershed;
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 19 of 33
(I) percent of wetland impacted;
(J) stream equilibrium condition, including geomorphic condition,
channel adjustment processes, and sensitivity, at the reach and valley segment
scales;
(K) degree of flow or water level regulation;
(L) change in land cover relative to natural cover;
(M) percent of cover of jurisdictional lake surface area with docks
and other encroachments;
(N) riparian conditions, including percent of lake shoreline length
with structural stabilizations and development within 50 feet of the shore;
(O) number and type of activities and extent of development in
stream or river corridors, floodplains, and watershed;
(P) program-specific activities, such as river corridor planning or
offset programs, intended to reduce current cumulative impacts and create
assimilative capacity; and
(Q) biomonitoring data, including results from targeted monitoring
plans for at-risk watersheds.
(f) Determination of reduction of receiving water quality resulting from the
proposed activity.
(1) In the course of reviewing an application for an individual permit or
in the development of a general permit, the Secretary shall determine the extent
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 20 of 33
to which a proposed discharge will result in a reduction in receiving water
quality by utilizing all credible and relevant information and the best
professional judgment of Agency staff.
(2) For discharges subject to this section, the Secretary may consider,
when appropriate, one or more of the following factors when determining if a
proposed new discharge will result in a reduction in water quality:
(A) the predicted change in ambient water quality criteria at the
appropriate critical conditions;
(B) percent and total change in loadings;
(C) nature, persistence, and potential effects of the pollutant;
(D) ratio of stream flow to discharge flow (dilution ratio);
(E) duration of discharge;
(F) measurable impacts to aquatic biota or habitat;
(G) existing physical, chemical, and biological data for the receiving
water;
(H) degree of hydrologic or sediment regime modifications; and
(I) any other flow modifications.
(g) Determination of socioeconomic impact. The Secretary shall consider
the following factors as appropriate in determining the anticipated economic or
social changes resulting from the proposed activity:
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 21 of 33
(1) measurable changes in economic and social conditions, specifically
tax base and number and types of jobs created or impacted;
(2) measurable direct and indirect economic benefits;
(3) correction of an environmental, public health, or public safety
problem;
(4) consistency with the Environmental Justice State Policy as set forth
in 3 V.S.A. § 6003;
(5) environmental, economic, and other benefits of maintaining the
higher water quality;
(6) value of the water resources;
(7) reduction of aquatic biota, aquatic habitat, aesthetics, and
recreational value that may result from lower water quality;
(8) information provided by other government agencies and public
participation;
(9) public use or accessibility of a resource; and
(10) proposed mitigating measures that reduce the impact of the
resulting lower water quality or increase the economic and social benefits, or
both.
(h) Determination of allowable reduction of water quality.
(1) In determining if the reduction of water quality is allowable, the
Secretary shall consider:
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 22 of 33
(A) reduction of water quality resulting from the proposed activity;
(B) the importance of the anticipated socioeconomic impacts; and
(C) the availability of funding programs to alleviate potential
financial burdens resulting from the maintenance of higher water quality in
environmental justice focus populations as defined in 3 V.S.A. § 6002.
(2) The Secretary shall allow a limited reduction in the existing water
quality only to the extent necessary to prevent substantial adverse
socioeconomic impacts on the persons of the State.
(i) Best management practices or permitting criteria; presumption of Tier 2
compliance. For proposed activities that may discharge to waters of the State,
the Secretary shall consider the effectiveness of best management practices or
permitting criteria relative to their socioeconomic impacts and require the
implementation of those best management practices that are cost-effective and
reasonable. The following permits shall require implementation of best
management practices determined by the Secretary to be cost-effective and
reasonable, and therefore projects that comply with the following permit
requirements shall be presumed to meet the Tier 2 requirements unless credible
and relevant project or site-specific information rebuts the presumption:
(1) Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation (CAFO) permits;
(2) NPDES stormwater permits;
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 23 of 33
(3) stormwater permits issued pursuant to section 1264 of this title;
(4) wetland permits issued pursuant to chapter 37 of this title;
(5) groundwater withdrawals that meet the no-undue-adverse-effect
criteria pursuant to the Agency of Natural Resources’ Groundwater
Withdrawal Reporting and Permitting Rules;
(6) indirect discharge permits issued pursuant to the Agency of Natural
Resources’ Indirect Discharge Rules; and
(7) any other NPDES or State permits that depend on best management
practices issued by the Agency for waters of the State.
(j) Reclassifying B(1) waters. For proposed activities that may discharge to
waters where the Secretary determines water quality data meets or exceeds the
minimum criteria for B(1) waters or to waters where the Secretary has received
an administratively and technically complete petition to reclassify the water to
B(1), the Secretary shall evaluate the proposed activity relative to the B(1)
criteria.
§ 1293. ANTIDEGRADATION ANALYSIS; WATERS CLASSIFIED AS
A(1)
(a) Applicability. This section applies to proposed activities that may
discharge to:
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 24 of 33
(1) waters classified as A(1);
(2) waters where the Secretary determines water quality data meets or
exceeds the minimum criteria for A(1); or
(3) waters where the Secretary has received an administratively and
technically complete petition to reclassify to A(1); and when proposed
activities would result in a measurable reduction in the physical, chemical, or
biological quality of such waters due to their location, size, and scale.
(b) Individual permits. For any activity subject to this section, the
Secretary shall require individual permit review and shall evaluate the
proposed activity relative to the A(1) criteria.
§ 1294. TIER 1; PROTECTION OF EXISTING USES
(a) The existing uses of waters, and the level of water quality necessary to
protect those existing uses, shall be maintained and protected. Existing uses
are a confirmation of the set of designated uses in the Standards regardless of
the class of the water.
(b) In making a determination of existing uses to be protected and
maintained under the antidegradation policy set forth in this subchapter, the
Secretary shall consider the designated uses and at least the following factors:
(1) aquatic biota and wildlife that utilize or are present in the waters;
(2) habitat that supports existing aquatic biota, wildlife, or plant life;
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 25 of 33
(3) the use of the waters for recreation or fishing;
(4) the use of the water for water supply, or commercial activity that
depends directly on the preservation of an existing high level of water quality;
and
(5) with regard to the factors considered under subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subsection, evidence of the uses’ ecological significance in the
functioning of the ecosystem or evidence of the uses’ rarity.
(c) In identifying existing uses, the Secretary shall:
(1) for contact and noncontact recreation, fishing, and public surface
water supplies, consider the information that the applicant submitted in
accordance with the Agency’s process for determining recreational uses;
information gathered in accordance with the Agency’s basin planning
procedure for determination of existing uses during the development of basin
plans; any relevant information from an applicable basin plan; and any other
relevant information regarding use of the receiving waters for contact and
noncontact recreation, fishing, and public surface water supplies; and
(2) for all other uses, including aquatic habitat and aquatic biota and
wildlife, presume that if the designated uses of the receiving waters are
currently being achieved and will continue to be achieved after evaluation of
the proposed activity, then any identified existing uses will also be maintained
and protected.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 26 of 33
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2026, and biannually thereafter, the Secretary
shall determine through the evaluation of existing water quality data the waters
that meet or exceed the minimum criteria for a higher class for one or more
designated uses.
(e) For waters where the Secretary determines water quality data meets or
exceeds the minimum criteria for a higher class for one or more designated
uses, or the Secretary has received an administratively and technically
complete petition to reclassify waters, any permit issued by the Secretary shall
ensure the maintenance of water quality necessary to protect that existing use.
(f) On or before January 1, 2027, and upon each subsequent triennial
rulemaking for the Vermont Water Quality Standards or upon each lake
classification under chapter 49, subchapter 2 of this title, the Secretary shall
propose to reclassify waters that meet the standards of subsection (e) of this
section for one or more designated uses.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. chapter 49 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 49. PROTECTION OF NAVIGABLE WATERS AND
SHORELANDS
Subchapter 1. General Use of Waters
* * *
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 27 of 33
§ 1424a. OUTSTANDING RESOURCE WATERS
(a) The Secretary, on his or her own motion, may hold a public hearing on
the question of whether particular waters should be designated as outstanding
resource waters, or whether an existing designation should be amended or
repealed. On receipt of a signed written request, the Secretary shall consider
the adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules regarding outstanding resource
water designation and shall take appropriate action as required under 3 V.S.A.
§ 806. Any hearing shall be held convenient to the waters in question, or in a
county where the waters are located.
(b) Any hearing shall be conducted as part of the rulemaking process
established under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
(c) [Repealed.]
(d) In making its rulemaking decision, the Secretary may consider, but
shall not be limited to considering, the following:
(1) existing water quality and current water quality classification,
including classifications of lakes and ponds under section 1432 of this title;
(2) the presence of aquifer protection areas;
(3) the waters’ value in providing temporary water storage for flood
water and storm runoff;
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 28 of 33
(4) the waters’ value as fish habitat;
(5) the waters’ value in providing or maintaining habitat for threatened
or endangered plants or animals;
(6) the waters’ value in providing habitat for wildlife, including stopover
habitat for migratory birds;
(7) the presence of gorges, rapids, waterfalls, or other significant
geologic features;
(8) the presence of scenic areas and sites;
(9) the presence of rare and irreplaceable natural areas;
(10) the presence of known archeological sites;
(11) the presence of historic resources, including those designated as
historic districts or structures;
(12) existing usage and accessibility of the waters for recreational,
educational, and research purposes and for other public uses;
(13) studies, inventories, and plans prepared by local, regional,
statewide, national, or international groups or agencies, that indicate the waters
in question merit protection as outstanding resource waters; and
(14) existing alterations, diversions, or impoundments by permit holders
under State or federal law.
(e) After consideration of all relevant information, the Secretary shall adopt
rules designating the waters as outstanding resource waters if it finds that they
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 29 of 33
have exceptional natural, recreational, cultural, or scenic values. Designation
as outstanding resource waters shall not invalidate the terms of existing permits
issued by the State or federal government.
* * *
Subchapter 2. Classification of Lakes and Ponds
§ 1431. POLICY
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) under the Vermont Constitution and 29 V.S.A. § 401, lakes and
ponds that are public waters of Vermont and the lands lying thereunder are
held by the State in a public trust for the citizens of the State;
(2) the proper management of the State’s lakes and ponds is of great
public interest and concern to the State in promoting the general welfare; in
preventing disease; in promoting health; in providing habitat for fish, shellfish,
and wildlife; as a source of recreational opportunity; and as a resource for
commerce and industry; and
(3) it is the policy of the State that the lakes and ponds of the State and
lands thereunder shall be managed to serve the public good by maximizing the
functioning and health of littoral ecosystems.
§ 1432. CLASSIFICATION OF STATE LAKES AND PONDS
(a) Definition. As used in this subchapter, “lakes and ponds” means all
natural inland lakes and ponds within Vermont.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 30 of 33
(b) Classifications of lakes. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall
review all lakes and ponds in the State for those criteria set forth under
subsection 1424a(d) of this title and shall classify each lake or pond according
to the following classifications:
(1) Natural condition lakes. Lakes or ponds that have exceptional
natural, recreational, cultural, or scenic values where recreation may be
allowed but where use for irrigation or public water supply should be limited
and where development should be limited due to the value provided by the lake
or pond or because adjacent lands have substantial constraints for
development, such as high water tables, exposed bedrock, and unsuitable soils.
(2) Moderate development lakes. Lakes or ponds that have certain
identified natural, recreational, cultural, or scenic value where recreation,
public water supply, or limited development has previously occurred and may
continue, provided that any use of the water or adjacent lands shall not degrade
the natural, recreational, cultural, or scenic value or water quality of the lake or
pond.
(3) General development lakes. Lakes or ponds that are generally large
lakes or ponds with high levels and mixes of existing development. These
lakes often are extensively used for recreation and are heavily developed
around the shore. Recreation and development may continue at general
development lakes, provided that use of the water or adjacent lands shall not
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 31 of 33
degrade the water quality of the lake or pond. Second and third tiers of
development are fairly common. The larger examples in this class can
accommodate additional development and use.
(c) Classification status.
(1) Until January 1, 2028, or reclassification under this section, lakes
and ponds shall retain the water quality classification identified for the water
under section 1253 of this title or the Vermont Water Quality Standards.
(2) A lake reclassified under this section shall maintain all uses and shall
retain all protection of water quality of the lake under its classification under
section 1253 of this title or the Vermont Water Quality Standards.
Reclassification under this section shall only improve protection of the uses
and water quality of the lake.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2028, any lake or pond that the Secretary
has yet to reclassify under this section shall be classified as a natural condition
lake where development of adjacent lands shall be prohibited.
(d) Procedure for classification.
(1) The Secretary, upon a petition from any person or on the Secretary’s
own motion, may reclassify any lake or pond in the State according to the
classifications set forth in subsection (b) of this section. The Secretary shall
base a reclassification on the factors set forth in section 1424a of this title and
the existing functions, values, and water quality of the lake or pond.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 32 of 33
(2) The Secretary shall hold at least one public hearing in the area to be
affected by the reclassification of a lake or pond for the purposes of collecting
public input and presenting the proposed classification for the lake or pond.
(3) If a proposed reclassification of a lake or pond would limit or
prohibit a previous use of the water and adjacent lands, the Secretary shall
amend the Vermont Use of Public Waters Rules to specify the limits on the use
of the water and adjacent lands.
(4) If a proposed reclassification would prohibit a previous use of the
lake or pond or adjacent lands, the Secretary shall conduct a use attainability
analysis of the water according to the requirements of 40 C.F.R. Part 131 as
published on July 1, 2026. The Secretary shall propose a prohibition of a use
of a lake or pond if one or more of the following is occurring:
(A) the lake or pond is not supporting the use;
(B) the use is degrading the water quality of the lake or pond; or
(C) the use has potential to degrade the water quality of the water to
the point that other existing uses of the water will be diminished or impaired.
(e) Discharges.
(1) The Secretary shall not issue a permit for a direct discharge to a
natural condition lake, including stormwater discharge, application of a
pesticide under an aquatic nuisance permit, or a pesticide application according
to an authorization issued by the Agency of Natural Resources.
VT LEG #386539 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.731
2026 Page 33 of 33
(2) The Secretary shall not issue a permit for a direct discharge to any
lake if the discharge by itself or in combination with other discharges or uses
of the water would result in the degradation of the water quality of the water or
would impair the uses of the water.
Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION
Beginning on January 1, 2027, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
issue decisions implementing the antidegradation policy for the State under
10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 1A.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386539 v.1